Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 13

Arkansas Civil War Sesquicentennial Commission

Effective Dates.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 128: July 1, 2016.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-13-101. Arkansas Civil War Sesquicentennial Commission.

(a)

The Arkansas Civil War Sesquicentennial Commission is created to assist the Division of Arkansas Heritage in carrying out its duties and responsibilities as provided in this chapter.

(b)

The purpose of the commission is to:

(1)

Promote a suitable statewide observance of the sesquicentennial of the Civil War;

(2)

Cooperate and assist national, state, and local organizations with programs and activities suitable for the sesquicentennial observance;

(3)

Assist in ensuring that any observance of the sesquicentennial of the Civil War is inclusive and appropriately recognizes the experiences and points of views of all people affected by the Civil War; and

(4)

Provide assistance for the development of programs, projects, and activities on the Civil War that have lasting educational value.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 635, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §
5615.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (a).

13-13-102. Members.

(a)

The Arkansas Civil War Sesquicentennial Commission shall consist of fifteen (15) members. The members shall elect a chair from the membership every four (4) years.

(b)(1)

The Governor shall appoint four (4) members to serve four-year terms.

(2)

The Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate each shall appoint two (2) members to serve four-year terms.

(c)(1)

These persons shall be residents of Arkansas who are recognized as being learned and interested in the history and the archeology of this state and who have demonstrated an interest in preserving the cultural resources of the state.

(2)

These persons also shall have a background in:

(A)

Arkansas history;

(B)

African-American history; or

(C)

Civil War history.

(3)(A)

Persons initially appointed by the Governor shall serve two-year terms. Persons initially appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall serve three-year terms and persons initially appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall serve four-year terms.

(B)

Subsequent appointees shall serve four-year terms.

(C)

Members may be reappointed.

(4)

The remaining Arkansas Civil War Sesquicentennial Commission membership shall consist of the following persons or their designees:

(A)

Director of the Division of Arkansas Heritage;

(B)

Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism;

(C)

Director of the Old State House Museum;

(D)

President of the Arkansas Historical Association;

(E)

Director of the Arkansas State Library;

(F)

Chair of the Martin Luther King, Jr. Commission; and

(G)

President of the Arkansas Civil War Heritage Trails Foundation.

(5)

The following persons shall serve in an advisory capacity:

(A)

Commander-in-Chief of the Sons of Confederate Veterans;

(B)

President General of the United Daughters of the Confederacy;

(C)

Superintendent of the Pea Ridge National Military Park; and

(D)

Commander-in-Chief of the Sons of Union Veterans of the Civil War.

(d)

Members of the Arkansas Civil War Sesquicentennial Commission shall serve without pay but may receive reimbursement in accordance with §25-16-902.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 635, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 120; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 120; 2019, No. 910, §
5616.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)

While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)

Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)

It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 126, provided:

“(a)

Except as provided in this section, provisions of this act altering the appointment structure of a task force, commission, committee, or other governmental entity shall not shorten the term of any member of the task force, commission, committee, or other governmental entity but shall be implemented by the filling of vacancies.

“(b)

The Governor may remove a member of the Arkansas Governor's Mansion Commission who was appointed to the commission before the effective date [May 23, 2016] of Section 85 of this act.”

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3, in (a), substituted “fifteen (15) members” for “sixteen (16) members” in the first sentence and “the membership” for “among the commission members” in the second sentence; and deleted former (c)(4)(C) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Director of the Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (c)(4)(A); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Arkansas Parks and Tourism” in (c)(4)(B).

13-13-103. Duties.

The Arkansas Civil War Sesquicentennial Commission shall have the following duties:

(1)

To plan, develop, and carry out programs and activities appropriate to commemorate the sesquicentennial of the Civil War era and encourage the development of programs that ensure that the commemoration results in a positive legacy and has long-term public benefits;

(2)

To encourage interdisciplinary examination of the Civil War;

(3)

To facilitate Civil War-related activities throughout the state;

(4)

To encourage civic, historical, educational, economic, and other organizations across the state to organize and participate in activities to expand the understanding and appreciation of the significance of the Civil War;

(5)

To coordinate and facilitate the public distribution of scholarly research, publications, and interpretation of the Civil War; and

(6)

To provide technical assistance to local organizations and nonprofit organizations to further the commemoration of the sesquicentennial of the Civil War.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 635, § 1.

13-13-104. Funding.

The General Assembly shall allocate sufficient funding to support the activities of the Arkansas Civil War Sesquicentennial Commission.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 635, § 1.

13-13-105. Expiration of Arkansas Civil War Sesquicentennial Commission.

The Arkansas Civil War Sesquicentennial Commission shall cease to exist effective December 31, 2015.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 635, § 1.